District of Columbia statutes.
3-1358

Use of budget authority.

(a)

The Commission may use its budget authority:

(1)

To effectuate the purposes of the Commission pursuant to the powers set forth in § 3-1354; and

(2)

To pay the Commission’s costs to administer the Commission.

(b)

Grants and financial support pursuant to § 3-1354(1) shall be used to complement, not supplement, existing resources, and to expand or encourage new initiatives to reduce the incidence of motor vehicle theft in the District of Columbia.

History

July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-197, § 9, 55 DCR 6277
June 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-320, § 503(c), 60 DCR 3390

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-320 rewrote the section heading, which read “Expenditures from Fund”; substituted “use its budget authority” for “expend money in the Fund” in the introductory language of (a); and deleted “and the Fund; provided, that money expended for this purpose shall not in any fiscal year exceed 15% of the amount of funds deposited in the Fund during the same fiscal year” from the end of (a)(2).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 503(c) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendments Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-599, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1017).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 503(c) of the Omnibus Criminal Code Amendment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-44, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5381, 20 DCSTAT 1281).